District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.21

Voting entitlement of members.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each member shall be entitled to one vote on each matter voted on by the members.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720